California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(a) A person represents themselves to be a speech-language pathologist when they hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the words “speech pathologist,” “speech pathology,” “speech therapy,” “speech correction,” “speech correctionist,” “speech therapist,” “speech clinic,” “speech clinician,” “language pathologist,” “language pathology,” “logopedics,” “logopedist,” “communicology,” “communicologist,” “aphasiologist,” “voice therapy,” “voice therapist,” “voice pathology,” or “voice pathologist,” “language therapist,” or “phoniatrist,” or any similar titles; or when they purport to treat stuttering, stammering, or other disorders of speech.

(b) A person represents themselves to be
 an audiologist when they hold themselves out to the public by any title or description of services incorporating the terms “audiology,” “audiologist,” “audiological,” “hearing clinic,” “hearing clinician,” “hearing therapist,” or any similar titles.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 3.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2530.4.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as authorizing a speech-language pathologist or audiologist to practice medicine, surgery, or any other form of healing, except that authorized by Section 2530.2.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 33.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2530.5.

(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting hearing testing conducted by licensed physicians and surgeons or by persons conducting hearing tests under the direct supervision of a physician and surgeon.

(b) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent a licensed hearing aid dispenser from engaging in testing of hearing and other practices and procedures used solely for the fitting and selling of hearing aids nor does this chapter restrict persons practicing their licensed profession and operating within the scope of their licensed profession or employed by someone operating within the scope of their licensed professions, including persons fitting and
 selling hearing aids who are properly licensed or registered under the laws of the State of California.

(c) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting or preventing the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology by personnel holding the appropriate credential from the Commission on Teacher Credentialing as long as the practice is conducted within the confines of or under the jurisdiction of a public preschool, elementary, or secondary school by which they are employed and those persons do not either offer to render or render speech-language pathology or audiology services to the public for compensation over and above the salary they receive from the public preschool, elementary, or secondary school by which they are employed for the performance of their official duties.

(d) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the activities and services of a student or speech-language pathology intern in speech-language pathology pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in speech-language pathology at an accredited or approved college or university or an approved clinical training facility, provided that these activities and services constitute a part of their supervised course of study and that those persons are designated by the title as “speech-language pathology intern,” “speech-language pathology trainee,” or other title clearly indicating the training status appropriate to their level of training.

(e) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the activities and services of a student or audiology intern in audiology pursuing a course of study leading to a degree in audiology at
 an accredited or approved college or university or an approved clinical training facility, provided that these activities and services constitute a part of their supervised course of study and that those persons are designated by the title as “audiology intern,” “audiology trainee,” or other title clearly indicating the training status appropriate to their level of training.

(f) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting the practice of an applicant who is obtaining the required professional experience specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 or subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25 and who has been issued a temporary license pursuant to Section 2532.7. The number of applicants who may be supervised by a licensed speech-language pathologist or a speech-language pathologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by
 the board shall be determined by the board. The supervising speech-language pathologist shall register with the board the name of each applicant working under their supervision, and shall submit to the board a description of the proposed professional responsibilities of the applicant working under their supervision. The number of applicants who may be supervised by a licensed audiologist or an audiologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board shall be determined by the board. The supervising audiologist shall register with the board the name of each applicant working under their supervision, and shall submit to the board a description of the proposed professional responsibilities of the applicant working under their supervision.

(g) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting hearing screening
 services in public or private elementary or secondary schools so long as these screening services are provided by persons registered as qualified school audiometrists pursuant to Sections 1685 and 1686 of the Health and Safety Code or hearing screening services supported by the State Department of Health Care Services so long as these screening services are provided by appropriately trained or qualified personnel.

(h) Persons employed as speech-language pathologists or audiologists by a federal agency shall be exempt from this chapter.

(i) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as restricting consultation or the instructional or supervisory activities of a faculty member of an approved or accredited college or university for the first 60 days following appointment after the effective date of
 this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 3.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2530.6.

(a) Speech-language pathologists and audiologists supervising speech-language pathology or audiology aides shall register with the board the name of each aide working under their supervision.

(b) The number of aides who may be supervised by a licensee shall be determined by the board.

(c) The supervising audiologist or speech-language pathologist shall be responsible for the extent, kind, and quality of services performed by the aide, consistent with the board’s designated standards and requirements.

(d) A
 speech-language pathology and audiology aide registration shall expire every two years and is subject to the renewal requirements in Article 6 (commencing with Section 2535).

(e) At the time of registration renewal, the speech-language pathologist or audiologist supervising the speech-language pathology or audiology aide shall update the board on the duties the aide performs while assisting the supervisor in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology, and the training program and assessment methods the supervisor is utilizing to ensure the aide’s continued competency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 4.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2530.7.

(a) An applicant, registrant, or licensee who has an email address shall provide the board with that email address no later than July 1, 2023. The email address shall be considered confidential and not subject to public disclosure.

(b) An applicant, registrant, or licensee shall provide to the board any changes to their email address no later than 30 calendar days after the changes have occurred.

(c) The board shall remind registrants and licensees of their obligation to report and keep current their email address with the board.

(d) For
 purposes of this section, “applicant, registrant, or licensee” means any person who applies for or holds a license, registration, or approval under this chapter, including, but not limited to, a speech-language pathologist, speech-language pathology aide, speech-language pathology assistant, audiologist, dispensing audiologist, audiology aide, or hearing aid dispenser.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 5.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [2531. - 2531.95.]

2531.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board in which the enforcement, administration, and other regulatory duties of this chapter are vested. The Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board shall consist of nine members, three of whom shall be public members.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the
 Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 6.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.02.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 4.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.06.

(a) The board is vested with the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction over the licensing and regulation of hearing aid dispensers as provided under Article 8 (commencing with Section 2538.10).

(b) In the performance of the duties and the exercise of the powers vested in the board under this chapter, the board may consult with hearing aid dispenser industry representatives.

(c) For the performance of the duties and the exercise of the powers vested in the board under this chapter, the board shall have possession and control of all records, papers, offices, equipment, supplies, or other property, real
 or personal, held for the benefit or use by the former Hearing Aid Dispensers Bureau.

(d) All regulations in Division 13.3 (commencing with Section 1399.100) of Title 16 of the California Code of Regulations are continued in existence under the administration of the board until repealed by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 516, Sec. 7.   (SB 305)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.1.

(a) Each member of the board shall hold office for a term of four years, and shall serve until the appointment and qualification of that member’s successor or until one year has elapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever first occurs. No member may serve for more than two consecutive terms.

(b) Notwithstanding the four-year terms set by subdivision (a), commencing on November 30, 2004, members appointed to the board shall serve the terms set forth below. Each of these terms shall count as a full term for purposes of subdivision (a).

(1) The
 two public members appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly, respectively, shall each serve a term of one year.

(2) One licensed speech-language pathologist and one licensed audiologist, as designated by the appointing authority, shall each serve a term of two years.

(3) One licensed speech-language pathologist and one licensed audiologist, as designated by the appointing authority, and the public member who is a licensed physician and surgeon, board certified in otolaryngology, shall each serve a term of three years.

(4) One licensed speech-language pathologist and one licensed audiologist, as designated by the appointing authority, shall each serve a term of four years.

(c) Upon completion of each of the terms described in subdivision (b), a succeeding member shall be appointed to the board for a term of four years.

(d) Each appointing authority shall have the power to remove from office at any time any member of the board appointed by that
 appointing authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 8.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.2.

The membership of the board shall include two licensed speech-language pathologists, two licensed audiologists, one of whom shall be an audiologist that dispenses hearing aids, two licensed hearing aid dispensers, and three public members one of whom is a licensed physician and surgeon, board certified in otolaryngology, and the remaining two public members who shall not be licentiates of the board or of any board under this
 division or of any board referred to in the Chiropractic Act or the Osteopathic Act.

The Governor shall appoint the physician and surgeon member and the other six licensed members qualified as provided in this section. The initial appointments of the licensed hearing aid dispenser members shall be made to fill the first licensed audiologist member vacancy and the first licensed speech-language pathologist member vacancy that occurs on or after January 1, 2010. The Senate Committee on Rules and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint a public member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 309, Sec. 9.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.3.

The board shall examine every applicant for a speech-language pathology license or an audiology license at the time and place designated by the board in its discretion, but at least once in each year; and for that purpose may appoint qualified persons to give the whole or any portion of the examination, who shall be designated as commissioners on examination. A commissioner on examination need not be a member of the board, but shall be subject to the same rules and regulations and shall be entitled to the same fee as if he or she were a member of the board.

The board shall perform all examination functions, including but not limited to, participation in uniform examination systems.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.4.

The board shall have full authority to investigate and to evaluate each and every applicant applying for a license to practice speech-language pathology or a license to practice audiology and to determine the admission of the applicant to the examination, if administered by the board, or to issue a license, in conformance with the provisions of, and qualifications required by, this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.5.

The board shall issue, suspend, and revoke licenses and approvals to practice speech-language pathology and audiology as authorized by this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.6.

The Governor has power to remove from office any member of the board for neglect of any duty required by this chapter, for incompetency, or for unprofessional conduct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.7.

The board shall elect annually a chairperson and vice chairperson from among its members. The board shall hold at least one regular meeting each year. Additional meetings may be held upon call of the chairperson or at the written request of any two members of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.75.

(a) The board may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer. The executive officer shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the board and vested in them by this chapter.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 9.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.8.

Five members of the board shall at all times constitute a quorum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.9.

Each member of the board shall receive a per diem and expenses as provided in Section 103.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2531.95.

The board shall from time to time adopt the regulations that may be necessary to effectuate this chapter. In adopting regulations the board shall comply with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Licenses [2532. - 2532.8.]

2532.

No person shall engage in the practice of speech-language pathology or audiology or represent themselves as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist unless they are licensed in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 4.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.1.

(a) Each person desiring to obtain a license shall make application to the board, upon a form as prescribed by the board.

(b) A separate license shall be granted in both speech-language pathology and audiology. An applicant may be granted both licenses upon successful completion of the requirements for both licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 21.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.2.

Except as required by Section 2532.25, to be eligible for licensure by the board as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist, the applicant shall possess all of the following qualifications:

(a) Possess at least a master’s degree in speech-language pathology or audiology from an educational institution approved by the board or qualifications deemed equivalent by the board.

(b) (1) Submit evidence of the satisfactory completion of supervised clinical practice with individuals representative of a wide spectrum of ages and communication disorders. The board shall establish by regulation the required number of clock hours, not
 to exceed 375 clock hours, of supervised clinical practice necessary for the applicant.

(2) The clinical practice shall be under the direction of an educational institution approved by the board.

(c) Submit evidence of no less than 36 weeks of satisfactorily completed supervised professional full-time experience or 72 weeks of professional part-time experience obtained under the supervision of a licensed speech-language pathologist or audiologist or a speech-language pathologist or audiologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board. This experience shall be evaluated and approved by the board. The required professional experience shall follow completion of the requirements listed in subdivisions (a) and (b). Full time is defined as at least 36 weeks in a calendar year
 and a minimum of 30 hours per week. Part time is defined as a minimum of 72 weeks and a minimum of 15 hours per week.

(d) (1) Pass an examination or examinations approved by the board. The board shall determine the subject matter and scope of the examinations and may waive the examination upon evidence that the applicant has successfully completed an examination approved by the board. Written examinations may be supplemented by oral examinations as the board shall determine. An applicant who fails their examination may be reexamined at a subsequent examination upon payment of the reexamination fee required by this chapter.

(2) A speech-language pathologist or audiologist who holds a license from another state or territory of the United States or who holds
 equivalent qualifications as determined by the board and who has completed no less than one year of full-time continuous employment as a speech-language pathologist or audiologist within the past three years is exempt from the supervised professional experience in subdivision (c).

(e) As applied to licensure as an audiologist, this section shall apply to applicants who graduated from an approved educational institution on or before December 31, 2007.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 10.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.25.

(a) An applicant seeking licensure as an audiologist shall possess a doctorate in audiology earned from an educational institution approved by the board. The board may, in its discretion, accept qualifications it deems to be equivalent to a doctoral degree in audiology. The board shall not, however, accept as equivalent qualifications graduation from a master’s program that the applicant was enrolled in on or after January 1, 2008.

(b) In addition to meeting the qualifications specified in subdivision (a), an applicant seeking licensure as an audiologist shall do all of the following:

(1) Submit evidence of the satisfactory
 completion of supervised clinical practice with individuals representative of a wide spectrum of ages and audiological disorders. The board shall establish by regulation the required number of clock hours of supervised clinical practice necessary for the applicant. The clinical practice shall be under the direction of an audiology doctoral program at an educational institution approved by the board.

(2) Submit evidence of no less than 12 months of satisfactorily completed supervised professional full-time experience or its part-time equivalent obtained under the supervision of a licensed audiologist or an audiologist having qualifications deemed equivalent by the board. This experience shall be completed under the direction of an audiology doctoral program at an educational institution approved by the board.

(3) Pass an examination or examinations approved by the board. The board shall determine the subject matter and scope of the examination or examinations and may waive an examination upon evidence that the applicant has successfully completed an examination approved by the board. Written examinations may be supplemented by oral examinations as the board shall determine. An applicant who fails an examination may be reexamined at a subsequent examination upon payment of the reexamination fee required by this chapter.

(c) This section shall apply to applicants who graduate from an approved educational institution on and after January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 10.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.3.

(a) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to Section 2532.1, and upon the payment of the fee prescribed by subdivision (i) of Section 2534.2, the board may issue a temporary license for a period of six months from the date of issuance to a speech-language pathologist or audiologist who holds an unrestricted license from another state or territory of the United States or who holds equivalent qualifications as determined by the board and has made application to the board for a license in this state.

(b) A temporary license shall terminate upon notice thereof by certified mail, return receipt requested, if it is issued by mistake or if the application for permanent licensure is
 denied.

(c) Upon written application, the board may reissue a temporary license to any person who has applied for a regular renewable license pursuant to Section 2532.1, and who, in the judgment of the board, has been excusably delayed in completing their application or the minimum requirements for a regular license. The board may not reissue a temporary license more than twice to any one person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 11.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.4.

(a) The board may direct applicants to be examined for knowledge in whatever theoretical or applied fields in speech-language pathology or audiology it deems appropriate. It may examine the applicant with regard to their professional skills and their judgment in the utilization of speech-language pathology or audiology techniques and methods.

(b) The examination may be written or oral or both. The examination shall be given at least once a year at the time and place and under such supervision as the board may determine. The board shall determine what shall constitute a passing grade.

(c) The board shall keep an accurate
 recording of any oral examination and keep the recordings as well as any written examination as part of its records for at least two years following the date of examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 12.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.5.

Every person holding a license under this chapter shall display it conspicuously in their primary place of practice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 510, Sec. 5.   (SB 887)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.6.

(a) The Legislature recognizes that the education and experience requirements of this chapter constitute only minimal requirements to assure the public of professional competence. The Legislature encourages all professionals licensed and registered by the board under this chapter to regularly engage in continuing professional development and learning that is related and relevant to the professions of speech-language pathology and audiology.

(b) The board shall not renew any license or registration pursuant to this chapter unless the applicant certifies to the board that they have completed in the preceding two years not less than the minimum number of continuing professional development hours
 established by the board pursuant to subdivision (c) for the professional practice authorized by their license or registration.

(c) (1) The board shall prescribe the forms utilized for and the number of hours of required continuing professional development for persons licensed or registered under this chapter.

(2) The board shall have the right to audit the records of any applicant to verify the completion of the continuing professional development requirements.

(3) Applicants shall maintain records of completion of required continuing professional development coursework for a minimum of two years and shall make these records available to the board for auditing purposes upon request.

(d) The board shall establish exceptions from the continuing professional development requirements of this section for good cause as defined by the board.

(e) (1) The continuing professional development services shall be obtained from accredited institutions of higher learning, organizations approved as continuing education providers by either the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the American Academy of Audiology, the California Medical Association’s Institute for Medical Quality Continuing Medical Education Program, or other entities or organizations approved as continuing professional development providers by the board, in its discretion.

(2) No hours shall be credited for any
 course enrolled in by a licensee that has not first been approved and certified by the board, if the board has sufficient funding and staff resources to implement the approval and certification process.

(3) The continuing professional development services offered by these entities may, but are not required to, utilize pretesting and posttesting or other evaluation techniques to measure and demonstrate improved professional learning and competency.

(4) An accredited institution of higher learning, an organization approved as continuing education providers by either the American
 Speech-Language-Hearing Association or the American Academy of Audiology, and the California Medical Association’s Institute for Medical Quality Continuing Education Program shall be exempt from any application or registration fees that the board may charge for continuing education providers.

(5) Unless a course offered by entities listed in paragraph (4) meets the requirements established by the board, the course may not be credited towards the continuing professional development requirements for license renewal.

(6) The licensee shall be responsible for obtaining the required course completion documents for courses offered by entities specified in paragraph (1).

(f) The board, by regulation, shall fund
 the administration of this section through professional development services provider and licensing fees to be deposited in the Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Fund. The fees related to the administration of this section shall be sufficient to meet, but shall not exceed, the costs of administering the corresponding provisions of this section.

(g) The continuing professional development requirements adopted by the board shall comply with any guidelines for mandatory continuing education established by the Department of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 13.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.7.

(a) Upon approval of an application filed pursuant to Section 2532.1, and upon payment of the fee prescribed by Section 2534.2, the board may issue a required professional experience (RPE) temporary license for a period to be determined by the board to an applicant who is obtaining the required professional experience specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25.

(b) Effective July 1, 2003, no person shall obtain the required professional experience for licensure in either an exempt or nonexempt setting, as defined in Section 2530.5, unless they are licensed in accordance with this section or are completing the final clinical
 externship of a board-approved audiology doctoral training program in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25 in another state.

(c) A person who obtains an RPE temporary license outside the State of California shall not be required to hold a temporary license issued pursuant to subdivision (a) if the person is completing the final clinical externship of an audiology doctoral training program in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25.

(d) Any experience obtained in violation of this act shall not be approved by the board.

(e) An RPE temporary license shall terminate upon notice thereof by certified mail, return receipt requested, if it is issued by mistake or if
 the application for permanent licensure is denied.

(f) Upon written application, the board may reissue an RPE temporary license for a period to be determined by the board to an applicant who is obtaining the required professional experience specified in subdivision (c) of Section 2532.2 or paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 2532.25.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 14.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2532.8.

(a) The board shall, until January 1, 2027, deem a person who holds a valid Certificate of Clinical Competence in Speech-Language Pathology issued by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association’s Council for Clinical Certification to have met the educational and experience requirements set forth for speech-language pathologists in Section 2532.2.

(b) The board shall, until January 1, 2027, deem a person who holds either a valid Certificate of Clinical Competence in Audiology issued by the American Speech-Language-Hearing Association’s Council for Clinical Certification or a valid American Board of Audiology certificate issued by the
 American Academy of Audiology to have met the educational and experience requirements set forth for audiologists in Section 2532.2 and 2532.25. 

(c) If an applicant qualifying for licensure under this section has obtained any equivalent qualifications in violation of the laws and regulations governing the practices of speech-language pathology or audiology or has not met the requirements for licensure, the applicant shall correct the deficiency to qualify for licensure. If the deficiency is not cured within one year from the date of the deficiency notice, the application for licensure is deemed abandoned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 11.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Denial, Suspension, Revocation, and Probation [2533. - 2533.6.]

2533.

The board may refuse to issue, or issue subject to terms and conditions, a license on the grounds specified in Section 480, or may suspend, revoke, or impose terms and conditions upon the license of any licensee for any of the following:

(a) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a speech-language pathologist or audiologist or hearing aid dispenser, as the case may be. The record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence thereof.

(b) Securing a license by fraud or deceit.

(c) (1) The use or administering
 to themselves of any controlled substance.

(2) The use of any of the dangerous drugs specified in Section 4022, or of alcoholic beverages, to the extent or in a manner as to be dangerous or injurious to the licensee, to any other person, or to the public, or to the extent that the use impairs the ability of the licensee to practice speech-language pathology or audiology safely.

(3) More than one misdemeanor or any felony involving the use, consumption, or self-administration of any of the substances referred to in this section.

(4) Any combination of paragraph (1), (2), or (3).

The record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of unprofessional conduct.

(d) Engaging in any act in violation of Section 650. 

(e) Advertising in violation of Section 17500. Advertising an academic degree that was not validly awarded or earned under the laws of this state or the applicable jurisdiction in which it was issued is deemed to constitute a violation of Section 17500.

(f) Committing a dishonest or fraudulent act that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a licensee.

(g) Incompetence, gross negligence, or repeated negligent acts.

(h) Other acts that have endangered or are likely to endanger the health, welfare, and safety of the
 public.

(i) Use by a hearing aid dispenser of the term “doctor” or “physician” or “clinic” or “audiologist,” or any derivation thereof, except as authorized by law.

(j) The use, or causing the use, of any advertising or promotional literature in a manner that has the capacity or tendency to mislead or deceive purchasers or prospective purchasers.

(k) Any cause that would be grounds for denial of an application for a license.

(l) Violation of Section 1689.6 or 1793.02 of the Civil Code.

(m) Violation of a term or condition of a probationary order of a license issued by the board pursuant to Chapter 5
 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(n) Violation of a term or condition of a conditional license issued by the board pursuant to this section.

(o) Disciplinary action taken by any public agency in any state or territory for any act substantially related to the practice of speech-language pathology, audiology, or hearing aid dispensing.

(p) Aiding or abetting any person to engage in the unlicensed practice of speech-language pathology, audiology, or hearing aid dispensing.

(q) Violating or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, any of the provisions of this
 chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 13.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2533.1.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of a speech-language pathologist, audiologist, or hearing aid dispenser is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order a licensee be disciplined or denied a license as provided in Section 2533 when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, or 1203.41 of the Penal Code allowing the person to withdraw their plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the
 verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information, or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 14.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2533.2.

Proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 746, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

2533.3.

Except as provided in Section 2538.42, any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months, or by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 449, Sec. 7.   (SB 933)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

2533.4.

Whenever a person other than a licensed speech-language pathologist, audiologist, or hearing aid dispenser has engaged in an act or practice which constitutes an offense under this chapter, a superior court of any county, on application of the board, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining the conduct. Proceedings under this section shall be governed by Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The board may commence action in the superior court under this section on its own motion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 415, Sec. 15.   (AB 2686)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

2533.5.

(a) The board may prosecute a person for a violation of this chapter.
